en: Dart Shafts
xx: Dart Shafts
cs: Násady na šipky
da: Dartskafter
de: Dartschäfte
es: Cañas para dardos
fr: Shafts de fléchettes
it: Aste per freccette
ja: ダーツシャフト
nl: Dartshafts
no: Dart-bakstykker
pl: Shafty do lotek
pt: Eixos para dardos
ru: Основы дротиков для дартса
sv: Dartskaft
tr: Dart Şaftları

en: Dart Tips
xx: Dart Tips
cs: Hroty na šipky
da: Dartspidser
de: Dartspitzen
es: Puntas para dardos
fr: Pointes de fléchettes
it: Punte per freccette
ja: ダーツティップ
nl: Dartpunten
no: Dart-spisser
pl: Groty do lotek
pt: Pontas para dardos
ru: Иглы дротиков для дартса
sv: Dartspetsar
tr: Dart Uçları

en: Dartboards
xx: Dartboards
cs: Terče na šipky
da: Dartskiver
de: Dartscheiben
es: Dianas
fr: Cibles, Cible
it: Bersagli freccette
ja: ダーツボード
nl: Dartborden
no: Dart-skiver
pl: Tarcze do darta
pt: Alvos para jogo de dardos
ru: Доски для дартса
sv: Darttavlor
tr: Dart Tahtaları

en: Darts
xx: Darts
cs: Jednotlivé šipky a sady šipek
da: Dartpile
de: Dartpfeile
es: Juegos de dardos
fr: Fléchettes
it: Freccette
ja: ダーツ矢
nl: Darts
no: Dart
pl: Rzutki
pt: Dardos
ru: Дротики для дартса
sv: Dartpilar
tr: Dartlar

en: Outdoor Recreation
xx: Outdoor Recreation
cs: Outdoorové aktivity
da: Friluftsliv
de: Outdoor-Aktivitäten
es: Actividades al aire libre
fr: Loisirs de plein air
it: Ricreazione outdoor
ja: 屋外レクリエーション
nl: Buitenrecreatie
no: Utendørsaktiviteter
pl: Rekreacja na świeżym powietrzu
pt: Atividades ao ar livre
ru: Товары для отдыха на открытом воздухе
sv: Utomhusaktiviteter
tr: Açık Hava Etkinlikleri

en: Boating & Water Sports
xx: Boating & Water Sports
cs: Lodě a vodní sporty
da: Sejling og vandsport
de: Boot- & Wassersport
es: Deportes acuáticos y navegación deportiva
fr: Plaisance et sports nautiques
it: Sport acquatici
ja: ウォータースポーツ・アクティビティ
nl: Boten en watersport
no: Båt- og vannsport
pl: Żegluga i sporty wodne
pt: Canoagem e esportes aquáticos
ru: Гребля и водные виды спорта
sv: Båt- och vattensporter
tr: Kayıkçılık ve Su Sporları

en: Boating & Rafting
xx: Boating & Rafting
cs: Kajaky\, kánoe a rafty
da: Sejlads og rafting
de: Bootssport
es: Navegación y rafting
fr: Plaisance et rafting
it: Nautica e rafting
ja: カヌー・ラフティング
nl: Varen en rafting
no: Båtsport og rafting
pl: Pływanie łodzią i rafting
pt: Navegação e rafting
ru: Товары для гребли и рафтинга
sv: Båtsport
tr: Kayıkçılık ve Rafting

en: Boating Gloves
xx: Boating Gloves
cs: Vodácké rukavice
da: Sejlhandsker
de: Handschuhe für den Bootssport
es: Guantes para navegación deportiva
fr: Gants de navigation
it: Guanti da canottaggio
ja: ボート用グローブ
nl: Boothandschoenen
no: Seilehansker
pl: Rękawice żeglarskie
pt: Luvas para remo
ru: Перчатки для гребли
sv: Båthandskar
tr: Tekne Eldivenleri

en: Canoe Accessories
xx: Canoe Accessories
cs: Kánoe – příslušenství
da: Kanosejlads – tilbehør
de: Kanuzubehör
es: Accesorios para canoas
fr: Accessoires de canoë, Accessoire de canoë kayak non électrique
it: Accessori per canoa
ja: カヌー関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor kanovaren
no: Kanotilbehør
pl: Akcesoria do kanadyjek
pt: Acessórios de canoagem
ru: Принадлежности для каноэ
sv: Kanottillbehör
tr: Kano Aksesuarları

en: Canoes
xx: Canoes
cs: Kánoe
da: Kanoer
de: Kanus
es: Canoas
fr: Canoës
it: Canoe
ja: カヌー
nl: Kano's
no: Kanoer
pl: Kanadyjki
pt: Canoas
ru: Каноэ
sv: Kanoter
tr: Kanolar

en: Kayak Accessories
xx: Kayak Accessories
cs: Kajaky – příslušenství
da: Kajakroning – tilbehør
de: Kajakzubehör
es: Accesorios para kayak
fr: Accessoires de kayak
it: Accessori per kayak
ja: カヤック関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor kajakken
no: Kajakktilbehør
pl: Akcesoria kajakarskie
pt: Acessórios para caiaques
ru: Принадлежности для байдарок
sv: Kajaktillbehör
tr: Kayık Aksesuarları

en: Kayaks
xx: Kayaks
cs: Kajaky
da: Kajakker
de: Kajaks
es: Kayaks
fr: Kayaks
it: Kayak
ja: カヤック
nl: Kajaks
no: Kajakker
pl: Kajaki
pt: Caiaques
ru: Байдарки
sv: Kajaker
tr: Kayaking Kanoları

en: Paddle Leashes
xx: Paddle Leashes
cs: Šňůry na pádla
da: Padel- og pagajremme
de: Paddelriemen
es: Correas para palas
fr: Leash pour pagaies
it: Guinzagli per remi
ja: パドル リーシュ
nl: Peddellijnen
no: Padlesnorer
pl: Smycze kajakowe
pt: Leashes para remo
ru: Тросы для весел
sv: Paddellina
tr: Kürek Bağlama İpleri

en: Paddles & Oars
xx: Paddles & Oars
cs: Pádla a vesla
da: Padler og årer
de: Paddel & Ruder
es: Palas y remos
fr: Pagaies et rames, Pagaie
it: Remi e pagaie
ja: パドル・オール
nl: Peddels en roeispanen
no: Ro- og padleårer
pl: Wiosła
pt: Pás e remos
ru: Вёсла
sv: Paddlar och åror
tr: Kano ve Kayık Kürekleri

en: Pedal Boats
xx: Pedal Boats
cs: Šlapadla
da: Pedalbåde
de: Tretboote
es: Barcas a pedales
fr: Pédalos
it: Barche a pedali
ja: ペダルボート
nl: Waterfietsen
no: Pedalbåter
pl: Rowery wodne
pt: Pedalinhos
ru: Водные велосипеды
sv: Pedaldrivna båtar
tr: Pedallı Tekneler

en: Row Boats
xx: Row Boats
cs: Veslice a pramice
da: Robåde
de: Ruderboote
es: Botes de remo
fr: Avirons
it: Barche da canottaggio
ja: ローボート
nl: Roeiboten
no: Robåter
pl: Łodzie wiosłowe
pt: Barcos a remo
ru: Гребные лодки
sv: Roddbåtar
tr: Kürekli Botlar

en: Whitewater Rafts
xx: Whitewater Rafts
cs: Rafty na divokou vodu
da: Raftingbåde
de: Rafts
es: Balsas para el descenso de rápidos
fr: Raftings pour eaux vives
it: Zattere per acque bianche
ja: ホワイトウォーターラフト
nl: Boten voor wildwatervaren
no: Stryk-raftingbåter
pl: Pontony do raftingu
pt: Botes de rafting
ru: Плоты для сплава по бурным рекам
sv: Forsränningsflottar
tr: Raftlar

en: Boating & Water Sport Apparel
xx: Boating & Water Sport Apparel
cs: Oblečení na lodě a vodní sporty
da: Sejlertøj og tøj til vandsport
de: Boots- & Wassersportkleidung
es: Equipamiento para deportes acuáticos y navegación deportiva
fr: Équipement de plaisance et sports nautiques
it: Attrezzatura per sport acquatici
ja: ウォータースポーツウェア
nl: Boot- en watersportkleding
no: Klær til båt- og vannsport
pl: Odzież żeglarska i do uprawiania sportów wodnych
pt: Roupas de canoagem e esportes aquáticos
ru: Одежда для гребли и водных видов спорта
sv: Kläder för båt- och vattensporter
tr: Kayıkçılık ve Su Sporları Kıyafetleri

en: Drysuits
xx: Drysuits
cs: Suché obleky
da: Tørdragter
de: Trockenanzüge
es: Trajes de buceo
fr: Combinaisons étanches
it: Mute stagne
ja: ドライスーツ
nl: Drysuits
no: Tørrdrakter
pl: Suche skafandry
pt: Roupa para mergulho
ru: Гидротермокостюмы
sv: Torrdräkter
tr: Su Geçirmez Elbiseler

en: Life Jacket Accessories
xx: Life Jacket Accessories
cs: Záchranné vesty – příslušenství
da: Redningsveste – tilbehør
de: Schwimmwestenzubehör
es: Accesorios para chalecos salvavidas
fr: Accessoires pour gilets de sauvetage
it: Accessori per giubbotti salvataggio
ja: ライフジャケット関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor reddingsvesten
no: Tilbehør til redningsvester
pl: Akcesoria do kamizelek ratunkowych
pt: Acessórios para coletes salva-vidas
ru: Принадлежности для спасательных жилетов
sv: Tillbehör till flytvästar
tr: Can Yeleği Aksesuarları